District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.50

General and special funds.

The General Fund of the District shall be composed of those District revenues which on January 2, 1975 are paid into the Treasury of the United States and credited either to the General Fund of the District or its miscellaneous receipts, but shall not include any revenues which are applied by law to any special fund existing on January 2, 1975. The Council may from time to time establish such additional special funds as may be necessary for the efficient operation of the government of the District. All money received by any agency, officer, or employee of the District in its or his official capacity shall belong to the District government and shall be paid promptly to the Mayor for deposit in the appropriate fund, except that all money received by the District of Columbia Courts shall be deposited in the Treasury of the United States or the Crime Victims Fund.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 803, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 450
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 753, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11243(c)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-130.
1973 Ed., § 47-130b.

Editor's Notes

Definitions applicable: The definitions in § 1-202 apply to this section.

Enactment upon adoption of federal legislation: Section 4 of D.C. Law 11-254 provided that “§§ 47-101, 47-117, 47-130, 47-301, 47-302, 47-303, 47-304, 47-304.1, 47-305, 47-310, 47-312, 47-317.1 through 47-317.6, 47-321 through 47-325, 47-327 through 47-331, and 47-332 through 47-334 of Title 47 §§ 1-204.41, 1-204.55, 1-204.50, 1-204.42, 1-204.43, 1-204.44, 1-204.46, 1-204.53, 1-204.47, 1-204.48, 1-204.49, 1-204.24a through 1-204.24e, 47-317.06, 1-204.61 through 1-204.65, 1-204.71 through 1-204.75, 1-204.81, 1-204.85, 1-204.86 and 1-204.90, 2001 Ed. of the District of Columbia Code shall be enacted as part of Title 47 upon the adoption by Congress of legislation so enacting these sections.”